Utah statutes.
59-12-2211.   Certified service provider or model 2 seller reliance on
commission certified software.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and subject to Subsection (4), a
certified service provider or model 2 seller is not liable for failing to
collect a sales and use tax required under this part if:
(a)  the certified service provider or model 2 seller relies on software the
commission certifies; and
(b)  the certified service provider's or model 2 seller's failure to collect a
sales and use tax required under this part is as a result of the seller's or
certified service provider's reliance on incorrect data:
(i)  provided by the commission; or
(ii)  in the software the commission certifies.
(2)  The relief from liability described in Subsection (1) does not apply if a
certified service provider or model 2 seller incorrectly classifies an item or
transaction into a product category the commission certifies.
(3)  If the taxability of a product category is incorrectly classified in
software the commission certifies, the commission shall:
(a)  notify a certified service provider or model 2 seller of the incorrect
classification of the taxability of a product category in software the
commission certifies; and
(b)  state in the notice required by Subsection (3)(a) that the certified
service provider or model 2 seller is liable for failing to collect the
correct amount of sales and use tax under this part on the incorrectly
classified product category if the certified service provider or model 2
seller fails to correct the taxability of the item or transaction within 10
days after the day on which the certified service provider or model 2 seller
receives the notice.
(4)  If a certified service provider or model 2 seller fails to correct the
taxability of an item or transaction within 10 days after the day on which the
certified service provider or model 2 seller receives the notice described in
Subsection (3), the certified service provider or model 2 seller is liable for
failing to collect the correct amount of tax under this part on the item or
transaction.
